Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-195
Odometers; motor vehicle dealer; not guilty of violation; conditions.

A licensed motor vehicle dealer reassigning a certificate of title shall not be guilty of a violation of sections 60-190 to 60-196 if such dealer has in his or her possession the transferor's statement and if he or she has no knowledge that the statement is false and that the odometer does not reflect the mileage actually driven by the motor vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 95.